Nebraska, session 109, LB438.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 9-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1103 For purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act:
(1) Authorized gaming operator means a person or entity licensed
pursuant to the act to operate games of chance within a licensed
racetrack enclosure;
(2) Authorized gaming operator license means a license to operate
games of chance as an authorized gaming operator at a licensed racetrack
enclosure;
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this
subdivision, authorized sporting event means a professional sporting
event, a collegiate sporting event, an international sporting event, a
professional motor race event, a professional sports draft, an individual
sports award, an electronic sport, or a simulated game; and
(b) Authorized sporting event does not include an instate collegiate
sporting event in which an instate collegiate or university team is a
participant, a parimutuel wager, a fantasy sports contest, a minor league
sporting event, a sporting event at the high school level or below
regardless of the age of any individual participant, or any sporting
event excluded by the commission;
(4) Collegiate sporting event means an athletic event or competition
of an intercollegiate sport played at the collegiate level for which
eligibility requirements for participation by a student athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of
collegiate athletics;
(5) Commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(6) Designated sports wagering area means an area, as approved by
the commission, in which sports wagering is conducted;
(7) Game of chance means any game which has the elements of chance,
prize, and consideration, including any wager on a slot machine, table
game, counter game, or card game, a keno lottery conducted in accordance
-2-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or sports wagering. Game
of chance does not include any game the operation of which is prohibited
at a casino by federal law;
(8) Gaming device means an electronic, mechanical, or other device
which plays a game of chance when activated by a player using currency, a
token, or other item of value;
(9) International sporting event means an international team or
individual sporting event governed by an international sports federation
or sports governing body, including sporting events governed by the
International Olympic Committee and the International Federation of
Association Football;
(10) Licensed racetrack enclosure means all real property licensed
and utilized for the conduct of a race meeting, including the racetrack
and any grandstand, concession stand, office, barn, barn area, employee
housing facility, parking lot, and additional area designated by the
commission in accordance with the Constitution of Nebraska and applicable
Nebraska law;
(11) Limited gaming device means an electronic gaming device which
(a) offers games of chance, (b) does not dispense currency, tokens, or
other items of value, and (c) does not have a cash winnings hopper,
mechanical or simulated spinning reel, or side handle;
(12) Online sports wagering platform means an integrated system of
hardware, software, or applications through which an authorized gaming
operator or its platform provider operates, conducts, or offers sports
wagering through the Internet to persons located within the State of
Nebraska;
(13) Platform provider means a sports wagering vendor that contracts
with an authorized gaming operator to provide an online sports wagering
platform;
(14) (12) Prohibited participant means any individual whose
participation may undermine the integrity of the wagering or the sporting
-3-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
event or any person who is prohibited from sports wagering for other good
cause shown as determined by the commission, including, but not limited
to: (a) Any individual placing a wager as an agent or proxy; (b) any
person who is an athlete, a coach, a referee, or a player in any sporting
event overseen by the sports governing body of such person based on
publicly available information; (c) a person who holds a paid position of
authority or influence sufficient to exert influence over the
participants in a sporting event, including, but not limited to, any
coach, manager, handler, or athletic trainer, or a person with access to
certain types of exclusive information, on any sporting event overseen by
the sports governing body of such person based on publicly available
information; or (d) a person identified as prohibited from sports
wagering by any list provided by a sports governing body to the
commission;
(15) (13) Racing license means a license issued for a licensed
racetrack enclosure by the commission; and
(16) (14) Sports wagering means the acceptance of wagers on an
authorized sporting event by any system of wagering as authorized by the
commission. Sports wagering does not include (a) placing a wager on the
performance or nonperformance of any individual athlete participating in
a single game or match of a collegiate sporting event in which a
collegiate team from this state is participating, (b) placing an in-game
wager on any game or match of a collegiate sporting event in which a
collegiate team from this state is participating, (c) placing a wager on
the performance or nonperformance of any individual athlete under
eighteen years of age participating in a professional or international
sporting event, or (d) placing a wager on the performance of athletes in
an individual sporting event excluded by the commission.
Sec. 2. Section 9-1110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1110 (1)(a) (1) The commission may permit an authorized gaming
-4-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
operator to conduct sports wagering. All sports wagering shall be
conducted by an authorized gaming operator located within a licensed
racetrack enclosure or in partnership with such authorized gaming
operator pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section. Any sports wager
shall be placed (i) in person or at a wagering kiosk in the designated
sports wagering area at the licensed racetrack enclosure or (ii) by means
of an online sports wagering platform that is offered by or in
partnership with an authorized gaming operator by an individual that is
located in the State of Nebraska. A parimutuel wager in accordance with
sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 may be placed in the designated sports wagering
area at the licensed racetrack enclosure. An individual employed and
authorized to accept a sports wager may also accept a parimutuel wager.
(b)(i) An authorized gaming operator may conduct sports wagering by
means of an online sports wagering platform or may contract with up to
one platform provider for purposes of providing sports wagering. A vendor
that does not have a contract with an authorized gaming operator to
conduct sports wagering by means of an online sports wagering platform
shall not be permitted to conduct sports wagering in the State of
Nebraska. Any sports wagering conducted by means of an online sports
wagering platform shall conform to all requirements relating to sports
wagering pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.
(ii) An authorized gaming operator or a vendor that has contracted
with an authorized gaming operator shall submit controls to the
commission for approval in a manner prescribed by the commission relating
to any online sports wagering platform that the authorized gaming
operator or the vendor intends to use to conduct sports wagering by means
of an online sports wagering platform. No authorized gaming operator or
vendor shall conduct sports wagering by means of an online sports
wagering platform until the controls for such online sports wagering
platform are approved by the commission.
-5-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
(2) A floor plan identifying the designated sports wagering area,
including the location of any wagering kiosks, shall be filed with the
commission for review and approval. Modification to a previously approved
plan must be submitted for approval at least ten days prior to
implementation. The area shall not be accessible to persons under twenty-
one years of age and shall have a sign posted to restrict access.
Exceptions to this subsection must be approved in writing by the
commission.
(3) The authorized gaming operator shall submit controls for
approval by the commission, that include the following for operating the
designated sports wagering area:
(a) Specific procedures and technology partners to fulfill the
requirements set forth by the commission;
(b) Other specific controls as designated by the commission;
(c) A process to easily and prominently impose limitations or
notification for wagering parameters, including, but not limited to,
deposits and wagers; and
(d) An easy and obvious method for a player to make a complaint and
to enable the player to notify the commission if such complaint has not
been or cannot be addressed by the sports wagering operator.
(4) The commission shall develop policies and procedures to ensure a
prohibited participant is unable to place a sports wager or parimutuel
wager.
(5) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any sports wagering winnings as defined in section
9-1303, an authorized gaming operator shall check the collection system
to determine if the winner has a debt or an outstanding state tax
liability as required by the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act. If such authorized gaming operator determines that the winner
is subject to the collection system, the operator shall deduct the amount
-6-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
of debt and outstanding state tax liability identified in the collection
system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings payment
of sports wagering winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount
deducted to the Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or
outstanding state tax liability as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 3. Section 9-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1204 (1) Of the tax imposed by section 9-1203 on gross gaming
revenue not generated by sports wagering, seventy-five percent shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Two and one-half
percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, two and one-half
percent to the General Fund, and seventy percent to the Property Tax
Credit Cash Fund. The remaining twenty-five percent of the tax shall be
remitted to the county treasurer of the county in which the licensed
racetrack enclosure is located to be distributed as follows: (1) If the
licensed racetrack enclosure is located completely within an
unincorporated area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall
be distributed to the county in which such licensed racetrack enclosure
is located; or (2) if the licensed racetrack enclosure is located at
least partially within the limits of a city or village in such county,
one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to
such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent to the city
or village in which such licensed racetrack enclosure is at least
partially located.
(2) The tax imposed by section 9-1203 on gross gaming revenue
generated by sports wagering shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit as follows: Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers
Assistance Fund, five percent to the Racing and Gaming Commission's
Racetrack Gaming Fund, twenty-seven and one-half percent to the Property
Tax Credit Cash Fund, twenty percent to the General Fund, and forty-five
percent to the Education Future Fund.
-7-

LB438 LB438
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Original section 9-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 9-1103 and 9-1110, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-